Arkansas, session 2025, HB1377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 4, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-4-221. Report concerning funds supporting organizations or programs
for new businesses or businesses established within the previous five years.
(a) By January 1 of each year, the Director of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission shall file an annual report that includes without
limitation:
(1) The percentage of economic development funding, including
without limitation community development block grants, supporting
organizations or programs:
(A) For individuals starting new businesses in this state;
or
*MBM110*
01/31/2025 3:00:29 PM MBM110

HB1377
(B) That provide services to businesses established within
the previous five (5) years whose principal place of business is in this
state; and
(2) The total dollar amount of economic development funding,
including without limitation community development block grants, supporting
organizations or programs:
(A) For individuals starting new businesses in this state;
or
(B) That provide services to businesses established within
the previous five (5) years and whose principal place of business is in this
state.
(b) The annual report under subsection (a) of this section shall be
filed with the:
(1) Governor;
(2) House Committee on Insurance and Commerce; and
(3) Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. The first annual
report under § 15-4-221 is due by January 1, 2027.

















01/31/2025 3:00:29 PM MBM110